Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 4258, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4258. A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury
a revolving fund for the Ethics Commission to be designated the
"Ethics Commission Fund". The Ethics Commission Fund shall be a
continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and
deposits to the fund shall consist of the first One Hundred Fifty
Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars
($250,000.00) of fees received by the Commission each fiscal year.
Fees collected each fiscal year in excess of One Hundred Fifty
Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars
($250,000.00) shall be placed to the credit of the Ethics Commission
Online Filing Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 2 4258.2 of
this act title.
B. All monies accruing to the credit of the Ethics Commission
Fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the
Commission for any expenses incurred in the implementation of its

duties as provided by law. Expenditures from the fund shall be made
upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4037 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 14th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4037 Page 3